Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 5. Accessibility of Handicapped to Public Buildings

Cross references. —

As to educational programs for handicapped children, see chapter 14 of title 21.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state statutes requiring construction of handicapped access facilities in buildings open to public, 82 ALR4th 121.

Construction and application of Architectural Barriers Act (42 USC §§ 4151 — 4157) providing for design and construction of public buildings to accommodate physically handicapped, 78 ALR Fed 877.

Validity, construction, and application of § 302 of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USCS § 12182), Prohibiting Discrimination on Basis of Disability by Owners or Operators of Places of Public Accommodation, 136 ALR Fed 1.

Remedies available under Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USC §§ 12101 et seq.), 136 ALR Fed 63.

Limitation of actions under the Americans With Disabilities Act (42 USC § 12101 et seq.), 144 ALR Fed 307.

When is individual regarded as having, or perceived to have, impairment within meaning of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12102(2)(c)), 148 ALR Fed 305.

Who is recipient of, and what constitutes program or activity receiving, federal financial assistance for purposes of § 504 of Rehabilitation Act (29 U.S.C. § 794), which prohibits any program or activity receiving financial assistance from discriminating on basis of disability, 160 ALR Fed 297.

When are public entities required to provide services, programs, or activities to disabled individuals under Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12132, 160 ALR Fed 637.

§ 16-6-501.
Building plans and specifications; required facilities; elevators; curb ramps; inspections; exceptions.

The plans and specifications for the construction of or additions to all buildings for general public use built by the state or any governmental subdivision, school district or other public administrative body within the state, shall provide facilities and features conforming with the specifications set forth in the accessibility and supplemental accessibility requirements of the 2012 edition of the International Building Code.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 158, § 2.

Every curb or sidewalk to be constructed or reconstructed in Wyoming, where both are provided and intended for public use, whether constructed with public or private funds, shall provide a ramp at points of intersection between pedestrian and motorized lines of travel and no less than two (2) curb ramps per lineal block. Design for curb ramps shall be designed in accordance with the current Americans With Disabilities Act accessibility guidelines.

Except as provided in this subsection, the state fire marshal or city engineer, or their designee, shall inspect any structure described in subsection (a) of this section at the request of any person. Curb ramps shall be inspected by the city at the request of any person and shall be modified or reconstructed by the contracting authority to meet the requirements of W.S.

16-6-501

through

16-6-504

.

Exceptions for good cause may be granted by the state fire marshal for any structure described in subsection (a) of this section or by the city for curb ramps.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-503; Laws 1975, ch. 142, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

35-13-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2015 ch. 158, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to construction and supervision of public buildings generally, see art. 7, § 22, Wyo. Const.

As to construction of sidewalks in cities and towns generally, see §§

15-6-501

through

15-6-504

.

As to required safety devices in public buildings, see §§

27-1-102

and

27-1-103

.

As to general powers and duties of state fire marshal, see §§

35-9-116

and

35-9-121

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b) and (d), substituted “administrator of the division of vocational rehabilitation” for “director of vocational rehabilitation,” and “program manager of the governor's committee on employment of people with disabilities” for “director of the governor's committee for employment of the handicapped”; and in (d) also substituted “occupational health and safety commission chairman” for “state safety engineer.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, removing specified requirements relating to elevators in buildings.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When does a public entity discriminate against individuals in its provision of services, programs, or activities under the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12132, 163 ALR Fed 339.

§ 16-6-502.
Building plans and specifications; state fire marshal; review and approval.

All plans and specifications for the construction of or additions to buildings for general public use, built by the state or any governmental subdivision, school district or other public administrative body within this state, shall be submitted for review and approval by the state fire marshal, who shall approve if he finds the plans provide facilities which conform to the specifications set forth in the accessibility and supplemental accessibility requirements of the 2012 edition of the International Building Code.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 30, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-504; Laws 1975, ch. 142, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 35-13-102; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2015 ch. 158, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the accessibility and supplemental accessibility requirements of the 2012 edition of the International Building Code” for “‘American Standard Specifications for Making Buildings and Facilities Accessible to and Usable by the Physically Handicapped’ (U.S. Patent No. A117.1-1961) as approved October 31, 1961, by the American Standards Association, now called the American National Standards Institute, Inc., and W.S.

16-6-501

, subject however to the waiver specified above.”

§ 16-6-503.
Building plans and specifications; state fire marshal; ruling and determination; filing of written objection.

The state fire marshal shall within five (5) days mail a copy of his ruling and determination to the contracting authority and to any other interested or affected person, as defined under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, who has made timely request of the state fire marshal for receipt of copies of all rulings and determinations. All mailings by the state fire marshal made under this section shall be made by certified mail. Any time within ten (10) days after receipt of the ruling or determination made by the state fire marshal the contracting authority or any other interested or affected person may object to the determination, or any part thereof as the contracting authority or any other interested or affected person deems objectionable by filing a written notice with the state fire marshal, stating the specific grounds of the objection. The written objection shall be filed in the records of the state fire marshal and shall be available for inspection by any person who may be affected.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 30, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-505; W.S. 1977, § 35-13-103; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 16-6-504.
Building plans and specifications; hearing on objection; final administrative determination; judicial review.

Within five (5) days of the receipt of the objection, the state fire marshal shall notify the department of fire prevention and electrical safety of the objection. That department shall set a date for a hearing on the objection to be held not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days following receipt of the objection notice from the state fire marshal. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by the department to the contracting authority and any other interested and affected persons at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for the hearing.

The procedure before the department of fire prevention and electrical safety for hearing of objections shall be as provided in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Within ten (10) days of the conclusion of the hearing, the department shall rule on the written objections and make the final determination it determines that the evidence warrants. Immediately upon its final determination, the department shall serve a certified copy thereof on the contracting authority and all other interested and affected persons who may have appeared at the hearing, by personal service or by registered or certified mail.

The final decision of the department of fire prevention and electrical safety is subject to review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. All proceedings in any district court affecting a determination of the department of fire prevention and electrical safety shall have priority in hearing and determination over all other civil proceedings pending in the court, except election contests.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 30, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-506; Laws 1975, ch. 142, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 35-13-104; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to department of fire prevention and electrical safety generally, see §

35-9-101

et seq.

For rule governing service of process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

For rule governing judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).